ani.lexd
LEXICON NounAbs
абур[inan1]                                                                     # грудь;
амру[inan1]                                                                     # приказ;
анччу[inan1]                                                                    # тень;
арком[inan1]                                                                    # ложка;
аскIар[inan1]                                                                   # войско;
ахъи[inan1]                                                                     # очаг;
ахьхьал[inan1]                                                                  # половина;
багьа[inan1]                                                                    # цена;
багьанна[inan1]                                                                 # причина;
башлухъи[inan1]                                                                 # башлык;
бекьи[inan1]                                                                    # хлев;
бел[inan1]                                                                      # лопата;
бертин[inan1]                                                                   # свадьба;
бесун[inan1]                                                                    # нож;
бешен[inan1]                                                                    # гнездо;
бил[inan1]                                                                      # гора;
буги[inan1]                                                                     # пища;
буртина[inan1]                                                                  # бурка;
бурчIина[inan1]                                                                 # ячмень;
ватIан[inan1]                                                                   # родина;
газа[inan1]                                                                     # кирка;
гали[inan1]                                                                     # шаг;
гару[inan1]                                                                     # шея;
гверзу[inan1]                                                                   # щека;
гел[inan1]                                                                      # сковорода;
гелчи[inan1]                                                                    # паутина;
гиза[inan1]                                                                     # корзина;
гожо[inan1]                                                                     # клык;
гудур[inan1]                                                                    # капкан;
гулла[inan1]                                                                    # пуля;
гъа[inan1]                                                                      # вымя;
гъадара[inan1]                                                                  # тарелка;
гъадукIол[inan1]                                                                # пень;
гъалатIи[inan1]                                                                 # ошибка;
гъижи[inan1]                                                                    # холм;
гъузи[inan1]                                                                    # грязь;
гьабу[inan1]                                                                    # уголь;
гьадурлъир[inan1]                                                               # готовность;
гьал[inan1]                                                                     # пар;
гьанкIо[inan1]                                                                  # гвоздь;
гьантIикIа[inan1]                                                               # ухо;
гьаркIу[inan1]                                                                  # глаз;
гьимъу[inan1]                                                                   # дно;
гьиᵸгьиᵸ[inan1]                                                                 # груша;
гьиᵸнцIо[inan1]                                                                 # камень;
гьир[inan1]                                                                     # медь;
гьишкIи[inan1]                                                                  # качели;
гьолIийа[inan1]                                                                 # охапка;
гьонкъо[inan1]                                                                  # жажда;
гьунар[inan1]                                                                   # подвиг;
давла[inan1]                                                                    # добыча;
дан[inan1]                                                                      # вещи;
дан[inan1]                                                                      # вещь;
дару[inan1]                                                                     # лекарство;
даъба[inan1]                                                                    # спор;
дунгил[inan1]                                                                   # яма;
дурмал[inan1]                                                                   # бинокль;
за[inan1]                                                                       # кулак;
зоб[inan1]                                                                      # зоб;
илалъир[inan1]                                                                  # материнство;
ингур[inan1]                                                                    # окно;
инкар[inan1]                                                                    # отказ;
инчи[inan1]                                                                     # яблоко;
ирси[inan1]                                                                     # наследство;
исиб[inan1]                                                                     # бок;
ихтийар[inan1]                                                                  # право;
йал[inan1]                                                                      # грива;
йарагъи[inan1]                                                                  # оружие;
йоргъан[inan1]                                                                  # одеяло;
кIвей[inan1]                                                                    # дым;
кIвенкьа[inan1]                                                                 # вилы;
кIол[inan1]                                                                     # рот;
кIонча[inan1]                                                                   # лук (растение);
кIору[inan1]                                                                    # узел;
кав[inan1]                                                                      # ворота;
карават[inan1]                                                                  # кровать;
карачел[inan1]                                                                  # волна;
квелъир[inan1]                                                                  # рукав;
кверччин[inan1]                                                                 # ручка;
кечIи[inan1]                                                                    # песня;
ккал[inan1]                                                                     # плесень;
коком[inan1]                                                                    # слива;
коцIи[inan1]                                                                    # веник;
къай[inan1]                                                                     # посуда;
къалам[inan1]                                                                   # карандаш;
къали[inan1]                                                                    # барабан;
къали[inan1]                                                                    # спичка;
къванкъва[inan1]                                                                # горло;
къен[inan1]                                                                     # стена;
къуват[inan1]                                                                   # сила;
къулийеб[inan1]                                                                 # туша;
къурчи[inan1]                                                                   # абрикос;
кьал[inan1]                                                                     # слой;
кьетон[inan1]                                                                   # бурдюк;
кьехва[inan1]                                                                   # пыль;
кьир[inan1]                                                                     # мост;
лIутIи[inan1]                                                                   # клин;
лажбар[inan1]                                                                   # краска;
лали[inan1]                                                                     # сажа;
лъарлъал[inan1]                                                                 # грабли;
лъин[inan1]                                                                     # волос;
магьар[inan1]                                                                   # нос;
макълатIис[inan1]                                                               # магнит;
маштику[inan1]                                                                  # мечеть;
мащу[inan1]                                                                     # труба;
мига[inan1]                                                                     # веретено;
мижа[inan1]                                                                     # пятка;
микъи[inan1]                                                                    # дорога;
милки[inan1]                                                                    # дом;
милъи[inan1]                                                                    # солнце;
милъур[inan1]                                                                   # лестница;
миргъал[inan1]                                                                  # пуговица;
михъур[inan1]                                                                   # ряд;
мицIцIи[inan1]                                                                  # язык;
мичIчIи[inan1]                                                                  # крапива;
могъорчIу[inan1]                                                                # хвост;
мочи[inan1]                                                                     # ветер;
мугьуру[inan1]                                                                  # печать;
мужру[inan1]                                                                    # жребий;
мулъа[inan1]                                                                    # ноготь;
мунагьи[inan1]                                                                  # грех;
мусру[inan1]                                                                    # саван;
муха[inan1]                                                                     # сказка;
набти[inan1]                                                                    # керосин;
назбар[inan1]                                                                   # пух;
нико[inan1]                                                                     # колено;
ниха[inan1]                                                                     # овес;
ничо[inan1]                                                                     # серп;
охо[inan1]                                                                      # гной;
очири[inan1]                                                                    # очередь;
пайда[inan1]                                                                    # польза;
паларсси[inan1]                                                                 # палас;
пастIан[inan1]                                                                  # дыня;
паччалухъи[inan1]                                                               # государство;
